Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. RCW 82.04.062 ("Sale at wholesale," "sale at retail" excludes sale of precious metal bullion and monetized bullionâComputation of tax) and 1985 c 471 s 5 are each repealed.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The repeal in section 1 of this act does not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under the statute repealed or under any rule or order adopted under that statute nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under the repealed statute.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act takes effect October 1, 2025.--- END ---